Oklahoma, session 2026, SB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-615 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the Feral Swine Eradication and


Control Grant Program. The purpose of the grant program shall be to


provide Oklahomans with education, equipment, and services


associated with the eradication and control of feral swine in


Oklahoma.

Req. No. 293 Page 1


B. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall, through collaboration with the Department of Wildlife


Conservation and the Oklahoma Conservation Commission, implement a


program or programs for the distribution of resources to assist with


the capture or deterrence of feral swine populations affecting


Oklahoma landowners or land lessors.


C. The total maximum grant fund shall be no more than Five


Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). The funds shall be derived


from legislative appropriations and other public and private sources


of monies including other grants and matching funds received by this


state from federal sources. The grants awarded through the Feral


Swine Eradication and Control Grant Program shall only be available


for the equipment, education, and services provided to Oklahomans


for the eradication of feral swine.


D. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry,


or any employee or agent of the Department shall not be liable for


damages in any civil suit or subject to criminal prosecution for any


injury resulting from the program, unless the injury or death is a


direct result of the gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional


misconduct of the Department or any employee or agent of the


Department.


E. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall promulgate the rules necessary for the implementation of this


program along with any educational material necessary for the proper

Req. No. 293 Page 2


eradication of feral swine for the landowners and land lessors


through this program as not to violate the provisions of subsection


D of this section. The Department may allow exemptions for


landowners and land lessors participating in this program from the


permits required to control nuisance and invasive species set forth


in Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-293 MR 12/30/2024 10:42:46 PM































Req. No. 293 Page 3